Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-624
Division; duties.

The division shall:

(1) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration and the Department of Correctional Services to develop and implement a plan to establish statewide operation and use of a continuum of community correctional facilities and programs;

(2) Develop, in consultation with the probation administrator and the Director of Correctional Services, standards for the use of community correctional facilities and programs by the Nebraska Probation System and the parole system;

(3) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration and the Department of Correctional Services on the development of additional reporting centers as set forth in section 47-624.01;

(4) Analyze and promote the consistent use of offender risk assessment tools;

(5) Educate the courts, the Board of Parole, criminal justice system stakeholders, and the general public about the availability, use, and benefits of community correctional facilities and programs;

(6) Enter into and administer contracts, if necessary, to carry out the purposes of the Community Corrections Act;

(7) In order to ensure adequate funding for substance abuse treatment programs, consult with the probation administrator and the Director of Correctional Services and develop or assist with the development of programs as provided in subdivision (14) of section 29-2252 and subdivision (20) of section 83-173;

(8) Study substance abuse and mental health treatment services in and related to the criminal justice system, recommend improvements, and evaluate the implementation of improvements;

(9) Research and evaluate existing community correctional facilities and programs, within the limits of available funding;

(10) Develop standardized definitions of outcome measures for community correctional facilities and programs, including, but not limited to, recidivism, employment, and substance abuse;

(11) Report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on the development and performance of community correctional facilities and programs. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A description of community correctional facilities and programs currently serving offenders in Nebraska, which includes the following information:

(i) The target population and geographic area served by each facility or program, eligibility requirements, and the total number of offenders utilizing the facility or program over the past year;

(ii) Services, programs, assessments, case management, supervision, and tools provided for offenders at the facility, in the program, or under the supervision of a governmental agency in any capacity;

(iii) The costs of operating the facility or program and the cost per offender; and

(iv) The funding sources for the facility or program;

(b) The progress made in expanding community correctional facilities and programs statewide and an analysis of the need for additional community corrections services;

(c) An analysis of the impact community correctional facilities and programs have on the number of offenders incarcerated within the Department of Correctional Services; and

(d) The recidivism rates and outcome data for probationers, parolees, and problem-solving-court clients participating in community corrections programs;

(12) Grant funds to entities including local governmental agencies, nonprofit organizations, and behavioral health services which will support the intent of the Community Corrections Act;

(13) Manage all offender data acquired by the division in a confidential manner and develop procedures to ensure that identifiable information is not released;

(14) Establish and administer grants, projects, and programs for the operation of the division; and

(15) Perform such other duties as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state established in the act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 36;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 47;

Laws 2010, LB864, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 58;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB679, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 52.